src/fastspell_dictionaries/sc_IT.aff
# L
# solu variantes logudoresas in -are
SFX L Y 145
SFX L are o are  #  istimo
SFX L are as are  #  istimas
SFX L are at are  #  istimat
SFX L are amos are  #  istimamos       
SFX L are amus are  #  istimamus
SFX L are ades are  #  istimades
SFX L are aes are  #  istimaes
SFX L are ant are  #  istimant
SFX L are ai are
SFX L are aia are
SFX L are aio are
SFX L are aias are
SFX L are ais are
SFX L are aiat are
SFX L are ait are
SFX L are aiamus are
SFX L are aimus are
SFX L are aizis are
SFX L are aiant are
SFX L are aint are
SFX L are ei are
SFX L are esi are
SFX L are eis are
SFX L are esis are
SFX L are eit are
SFX L are esit are
SFX L are emus are
SFX L are estis are
SFX L are eint are
SFX L are esint are
SFX L are hei [cg]are
SFX L are hesi [cg]are
SFX L are heis [cg]are
SFX L are hesis [cg]are
SFX L are heit [cg]are
SFX L are hesit [cg]are
SFX L are hemus [cg]are
SFX L are hestis [cg]are
SFX L are heint [cg]are
SFX L are hesint [cg]are
SFX L are e are  #  chi istime
SFX L are es are  #  chi istimes
SFX L are et are  #  chi isse istimet
SFX L are emas are  #  chi istimemas 
SFX L are emus are  #  chi istimemus
SFX L are edas are  #  chi istimedas
SFX L are ent are  #  chi istiment 
SFX L are he [cg]are  #  chi paghe, lighe
SFX L are hes [cg]are  #  chi paghes, lighes
SFX L are het [cg]are  #  chi paghet, lighet
SFX L are hemas [cg]are  #  chi paghemas, lighemas
SFX L are hemus [cg]are  #  chi paghemus, lighemus 
SFX L are hedas [cg]are  #  chi paghedas, lighedas
SFX L are hent [cg]are  #  chi paghent, lighent
SFX L are era are  #  chi istimera  
SFX L are ere are  #  chi istimere
SFX L are eras are  #  chi istimeras 
SFX L are eres are  #  chi istimeres
SFX L are erat are  #  chi isse istimerat
SFX L are eret are  #  chi isse istimerat
SFX L are eremus are  #  chi istimeremus 
SFX L are erezis are  #  chi istimerezis
SFX L are erant are  #  chi istimerent 
SFX L are erent are  #  chi istimerent 
SFX L are hera [cg]are  #  chi istimera, lighera  
SFX L are here [cg]are  #  chi istimere, lighere
SFX L are heras [cg]are  #  chi istimeras 
SFX L are heres [cg]are  #  chi istimeres
SFX L are herat [cg]are  #  chi isse istimeret
SFX L are heret [cg]are  #  chi isse istimeret
SFX L are heremus [cg]are  #  chi istimeremus 
SFX L are herezis [cg]are  #  chi istimerezis
SFX L are herant [cg]are  #  chi istimerent
SFX L are herent [cg]are  #  chi istimerent
SFX L are a are  #  istima
SFX L are ade are  #  istimade
SFX L are ae are  #  istimae
SFX L are àdemi are  #  istimàdemi
SFX L are àemi are  #  istimàemi
SFX L are àdebbos are  #  istimàdebbos
SFX L are àebbos are  #  istimàebbos
SFX L are àdennos are  #  istimàdennos
SFX L are àennos are  #  istimàennos
SFX L are àdela are  #  istimàdela
SFX L are àela are  #  istimàela
SFX L are àdelas are  #  istimàdelas
SFX L are àelas are  #  istimàelas
SFX L are àdelu are  #  istimàdelu
SFX L are àelu are  #  istimàelu
SFX L are àdelos are  #  istimàdelos
SFX L are àelos are  #  istimàelos
SFX L are adu are  #  istimadu
SFX L are au are  #  istimau
SFX L are ados are  #  istimados
SFX L are aos are  #  istimaos
SFX L are ada are  #  istimada
SFX L are adas are  #  istimadas
SFX L are andhe are
SFX L are anne are
SFX L are ando are
SFX L are anno are
SFX L are endhe are
SFX L are enne are
SFX L are hendhe [cg]are  #  lighendhe
SFX L are henne [cg]are  #  lighenne
SFX L are àndhemi are
SFX L are ànnemi are
SFX L are hèndhemi [cg]are
SFX L are hènnemi [cg]are
SFX L are àndhedi are
SFX L are ànnedi are
SFX L are hèndhedi [cg]are
SFX L are hènnedi [cg]are
SFX L are àndhelu are
SFX L are àndhelos are
SFX L are ànnedhu are
SFX L are ànnedhos are
SFX L are ànnelu are
SFX L are ànnelos are
SFX L are hèndhelu [cg]are
SFX L are hèndhelos [cg]are
SFX L are hènnelu [cg]are
SFX L are hènnelos [cg]are
SFX L are àndhela are
SFX L are àndhelas are
SFX L are ànnedha are
SFX L are ànnedhas are
SFX L are ànnela are
SFX L are ànnelas are
SFX L are hèndhela [cg]are
SFX L are hèndhelas [cg]are
SFX L are hènnela [cg]are
SFX L are hènnelas [cg]are
SFX L are àndhennos are
SFX L are àndhebbos are
SFX L are ànnennos are
SFX L are ànnebbos are
SFX L are hèndhennos [cg]are
SFX L are hèndhebbos [cg]are
SFX L are hènnennos [cg]are
SFX L are hènnebbos [cg]are
SFX L are àndhesi are
SFX L are ànnesi are
SFX L are hèndhesi [cg]are
SFX L are hènnesi [cg]are

########## sos àteros inditos pro sos vrb. in -ARE/ -AI: 
