src/fastspell_dictionaries/sc_IT.dic
abbalucare/Lb
abbaronare/Lb
abbeltudare/Lb
abberelare/Lb
abbinatare/Lb
abbizare/Lb
abboscicare/Lb
abbrontare/Lb
abbudegare/Lb
abbultzare/Lb
abburruntare/Lb
abbuturare/Lb
acaizonare/Lb
acannonare/Lb
acastedhare/Lb
achiconare/Lb
aciapare/Lb
aclamare/Lb
acolondrare/Lb
acorinare/Lb
acostanare/Lb
acrassare/Lb
acucurrare/Lb
acumetare/Lb
addare/Lb
addoare/Lb
addrommentare/Lb
aenzare/Lb
afaltzare/Lb
afaturare/Lb
aferrare/Lb
afilerinare/Lb
afoderare/Lb
aframicosare/Lb
afriscionare/Lb
afuscare/Lb
aggangusare/Lb
agghironare/Lb
aggrundhare/Lb
agiogulare/Lb
agiuponare/Lb
alabare/Lb
allacare/Lb
allarmare/Lb
allentzare/Lb
allicantzare/Lb
allivellare/Lb
alloroscare/Lb
alluscorare/Lb
alzolare/Lb
ammacare/Lb
ammajucare/Lb
ammanitzare/Lb
ammasedare/Lb
ammedhare/Lb
ammerrare/Lb
amminguare/Lb
ammolare/Lb
ammorutolare/Lb
ammuntare/Lb
ammurrionare/Lb
ammutullonare/Lb
anidare/Lb
annientare/Lb
annuare/Lb
antzianare/Lb
apabassare/Lb
apantasimare/Lb
apaseguare/Lb
apedrare/Lb
aperdisare/Lb
apiagare/Lb
apillare/Lb
apisilicare/Lb
aplopodhare/Lb
apossessare/Lb
apresare/Lb
aprovendhare/Lb
apumitzare/Lb
apurare/Lb
arcare/Lb
argasare/Lb
arrabatare/Lb
arraighinare/Lb
arrangare/Lb
arrebbatare/Lb
arregalare/Lb
arremialzare/Lb
arrepiconare/Lb
arribbucare/Lb
arrodeare/Lb
arrudhare/Lb
arruncinare/Lb
arvadare/Lb
asfartare/Lb
assaconare/Lb
assannare/Lb
assegurare/Lb
asseriatzare/Lb
assimbizare/Lb
assologare/Lb
assufratare/Lb
assustrare/Lb
ataconare/Lb
atastare/Lb
atenscionare/Lb
atimpanare/Lb
atonare/Lb
atrajare/Lb
atrebutzare/Lb
atrighentare/Lb
atronizare/Lb
atuledhare/Lb
aturundhare/Lb
atzibbare/Lb
atzotare/Lb
aufare/Lb
ausentare/Lb
avitare/Lb
azannarare/Lb
azuramentare/Lb
balanzare/Lb
banzare/Lb
barsanare/Lb
bebbechinare/Lb
bessare/Lb
biltentare/Lb
bisitare/Lb
bofetare/Lb
borrare/Lb
bribillare/Lb
broculare/Lb
bufutzare/Lb
bumbullitare/Lb
bustare/Lb
cadentzare/Lb
calaginare/Lb
calmare/Lb
camulare/Lb
capare/Lb
carelare/Lb
carrotzare/Lb
caschidare/Lb
caturare/Lb
cheltare/Lb
chichinare/Lb
chiriellare/Lb
ciannigare/Lb
cicisbeare/Lb
ciucare/Lb
cogonedhare/Lb
collonare/Lb
conchistare/Lb
contularzare/Lb
corotare/Lb
cosuare/Lb
cracunare/Lb
crebare/Lb
crofare/Lb
cubilare/Lb
cugumedhare/Lb
cumbatare/Lb
cumportare/Lb
cunfidare/Lb
cuntrobare/Lb
curtzinare/Lb
dannizare/Lb
deificare/Lb
desertare/Lb
difaltare/Lb
dirmazare/Lb
disaugare/Lb
disfaltare/Lb
dispertare/Lb
diventare/Lb
dudhurare/Lb
ecuilibbrare/Lb
eritare/Lb
fadare/Lb
farrancare/Lb
fenenare/Lb
finicare/Lb
foglietare/Lb
forrojare/Lb
frascare/Lb
frigassare/Lb
frommigare/Lb
fudichinare/Lb
gafeare/Lb
garronare/Lb
ghipare/Lb
giarigare/Lb
giuare/Lb
granzeare/Lb
gulare/Lb
ifascare/Lb
ifrixare/Lb
ilbramare/Lb
ilgiarare/Lb
illainare/Lb
illeonare/Lb
illimbedhare/Lb
illozare/Lb
illutonare/Lb
ilventare/Lb
imballare/Lb
imbastare/Lb
imbendhare/Lb
imbimbinare/Lb
imbrajare/Lb
imbrocare/Lb
imbrunconare/Lb
imbulare/Lb
imbuvonare/Lb
immatonare/Lb
imminzare/Lb
impagonzare/Lb
imparedhare/Lb
imperare/Lb
impigare/Lb
impitzare/Lb
impomponare/Lb
imprelleare/Lb
impulmonare/Lb
incabizonare/Lb
incaltzonare/Lb
incaparronare/Lb
incastrare/Lb
inchintare/Lb
inciupare/Lb
inconare/Lb
incotzigare/Lb
incrinare/Lb
incucare/Lb
indeinare/Lb
indoare/Lb
indurare/Lb
infilerinare/Lb
infossare/Lb
infuscare/Lb
ingancellare/Lb
inghindhulare/Lb
ingolosinare/Lb
ingrillare/Lb
ingulpare/Lb
innennerare/Lb
insabonare/Lb
insuare/Lb
interighinare/Lb
intinzare/Lb
intrannare/Lb
intucherare/Lb
intzerare/Lb
invasare/Lb
inzomare/Lb
irbarchilare/Lb
irbiculare/Lb
irbrinucare/Lb
irbuzare/Lb
irfaghinare/Lb
irfinighedhare/Lb
irfregorare/Lb
irfunare/Lb
irgarrare/Lb
irgradheronare/Lb
irmagnare/Lb
irmendhare/Lb
irmisinare/Lb
irragare/Lb
irrejare/Lb
irrundhare/Lb
irvojare/Lb
isancare/Lb
isballare/Lb
isbenitare/Lb
isboetare/Lb
isbrighinzare/Lb
isbuzare/Lb
iscadhigare/Lb
iscalmentare/Lb
iscancare/Lb
iscapidhare/Lb
iscarrafare/Lb
iscasciolare/Lb
iscatzedhare/Lb
ischerfare/Lb
ischifare/Lb
ischirrare/Lb
isciapare/Lb
iscobare/Lb
iscoldiolare/Lb
isconculare/Lb
iscordigliolare/Lb
iscorzolare/Lb
iscrachedhare/Lb
iscratzare/Lb
iscrodocare/Lb
iscualtare/Lb
iscuidare/Lb
isculuvonare/Lb
iscumpanzinare/Lb
iscurrizare/Lb
iscutare/Lb
isdoare/Lb
isermorare/Lb
isferrare/Lb
isfogonare/Lb
isfrenare/Lb
isfurrare/Lb
isghelare/Lb
isgranare/Lb
isirchilare/Lb
ismalaidare/Lb
ismedhinare/Lb
ismuculare/Lb
isolicrare/Lb
isozighinare/Lb
ispaltzighinare/Lb
ispartighinare/Lb
ispeculizare/Lb
ispeltzificare/Lb
ispertudhare/Lb
ispilucare/Lb
ispiridare/Lb
ispizolare/Lb
isportinare/Lb
ispreducare/Lb
isprorare/Lb
ispunsulare/Lb
issalare/Lb
issilicare/Lb
issuculare/Lb
istancare/Lb
istelare/Lb
isterrare/Lb
istesorzare/Lb
istimpidare/Lb
istocare/Lb
istorbare/Lb
istrampare/Lb
istrazolare/Lb
istrisinare/Lb
istrumbonare/Lb
istuntonare/Lb
istzufare/Lb
isventare/Lb
isvortulare/Lb
ivoligare/Lb
lampizare/Lb
laurare/Lb
lillirare/Lb
lodurare/Lb
lumburare/Lb
majodhare/Lb
manchinare/Lb
manuzare/Lb
marrinzedhare/Lb
mascrare/Lb
matulare/Lb
meliagrare/Lb
merendhare/Lb
minestrare/Lb
modhinare/Lb
mudare/Lb
mulmutare/Lb
murrapare/Lb
nacarare/Lb
nesigare/Lb
nomenare/Lb
obilare/Lb
oretare/Lb
orromicare/Lb
pabassare/Lb
papadare/Lb
partetzipare/Lb
patentare/Lb
pensare/Lb
pessare/Lb
pienare/Lb
pipatzare/Lb
pistutzare/Lb
poltare/Lb
precadorare/Lb
prentzare/Lb
proischinare/Lb
pudidinare/Lb
pusinare/Lb
ranzidare/Lb
rebbellare/Lb
recordare/Lb
refriscare/Lb
remenare/Lb
reontzare/Lb
resinare/Lb
revisionare/Lb
ricupessare/Lb
risitare/Lb
rosinare/Lb
runtzinare/Lb
sainare/Lb
sartzare/Lb
segnare/Lb
sepurtare/Lb
sfagonare/Lb
singurtare/Lb
soluvrinare/Lb
subare/Lb
sucutare/Lb
sulvare/Lb
surfatare/Lb
sutronare/Lb
tallare/Lb
tasicare/Lb
terrafinare/Lb
tintiedhare/Lb
tortojare/Lb
tracare/Lb
trampistare/Lb
trassicare/Lb
trepedhare/Lb
trimbare/Lb
trixinare/Lb
troulare/Lb
trunfare/Lb
turdare/Lb
tzacotare/Lb
tzichetare/Lb
tzirulare/Lb
tzurricare/Lb
umidare/Lb
urminare/Lb
vardare/Lb
vigiulare/Lb
vortulare/Lb
zistrare/Lb
